src/fst/phonology.twolc
"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem r"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^N:r <=> r: %> _ ;

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem s in infinitives"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!%^N:t <=> s %> _ [%^A:|%^U: [.#.|%>]|| e [s s|n]] ; ! noustessa, nousten, kusta, pestä, kustu, pesty
%^N:t <=> s %> _ [%^A:| e [s s|n]] ; ! noustessa, nousten, kusta, pestä, nousta
!! **Tests:**

!!€ häris>^N^A
!!€ häris>tä

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem s in participles"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^N:s <=> s %> _ %^U: (t) ; ! kussut, pessyt
 !         s %> _ e ;      ! kusseet (?)

	  
"j:0 in front of i"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
j:0 <=> l _ e: %^E2I:0 ;



!! ## Vowel change rules: a - ä - e - i - o - ö - u - y

!! Here come the rules for stem vowel changes in front of suffix *-i-*
!! (be it plural, present, comparative or conditional).
!! Vowels are deleted or changed according to context.
!! There are also some other vowel change rules.

!! ###  a rules

"a:e"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
a:e <=> _ %^AE: ;

"a:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
a:0 <=>                                              _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> ;        ! before metathesis h
    [.#.|#] Cns:* RoundedVowel (Vow) Cns:+ (:Cns) (Vow:)        _ (%^WG:)  %> [i2:|i3:|j] ;   ! kuva:kuvissa TEST extravokal koirile (ta bort sista (Vow:)?)
    [.#.|#] Cns    a                                 _          %> [i2:|i3:|i4:] ; ! saa:sai
    [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:)  %>      i3: ;   ! ??? 
    [.#.|#] Cns:* RoundedVowel (Vow) Cns:+ _ (%^WG:)  %> i3: ;   ! huutaa>huusin

!! **Tests:**
!!€ kuva>i2ss^A
!!€ kuv0>issa
!!€ kuv0a^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ kuvv00>haan
!!€ saa>i3t
!!€ sa0>it

"a:o when nonrounded root vowel and before i"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
a:o <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* UnroundedVowel:+ ([u|i|e|a]) Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:) %> [i2:|i3:|i8:|j] ; !saunoissa
        [.#.|#] Cns:* UnroundedVowel:+ ([o|u])     Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:) %> [i2:|i3:|i8:|j] ; ! see fkv
        [.#.|#] Cns:*          Vow:+    Cns:+  Vow Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:) %> [i2:|j]     ; !lukijoissa, apinoissa    
         Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns:+ (Cns:) Vow:+  (Cns:) Cns: Cns: _ (%^WG:) %> [i2:] ; !almunakoissa; (flerstaviga) a>o efter två Cns
        [.#.|#] Vow:+  Cns:+ (Cns:) (Vow:) i: Cns:+ (Cns:) _ (%^WG:) %> [i2:|j]; !; (flerstaviga) a>o efter i !NY alkeija

!! **Tests:**
!!€ laatia>i2tten
!!€ laatio>itten
!!€ fankila>i2ss^A
!!€ fankilo>issa

!! ###  ä rules

"ä:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
ä:0 <=>         Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ _ (WeakGrade)  %> [i2:|i3:|i8:|j] ; ! before i
                                  _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:]            ; ! before metathesis h
         [.#.|#] Cns    ä         _          %> [i2:|i3:|i5:|i8:]     ; ! jäädä : jäi

!! **Tests:**
!!€ sytyttä^WG>i3n
!!€ sytyt000>in
!!€ päivä>i2ss^A
!!€ päiv0>issä
!!€ pitä>i3
!!€ pit0>i
!!€ jää>i3n
!!€ jä0>in

"ä:e"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
ä:e <=> _ %^AE: %^WG: %> t h  ;


!! ###  e rules

"e:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** deletes *-e-* in LNR stems as well as before -i-
e:0 <=>                                                   _ (WeakGrade) h %> e ; ! säkheen del before h in e stems
                                                          _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;
                         [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [h|l|n|r|t] _ %> t [%^A:|%^U:]; ! tulta, tultu
                           [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [l|n|r] t _ %> t [%^A:|%^U:]; ! tulta, tultu
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|u] l _ %> t e n ; ! kielten, puolten
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|e] r _ %> t e n ; ! merten, puolten
[.#.|#|%-] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u ([u|o])|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :n _ %> t e n ; !unten, lunten, sienten, lienten
                                                     Cns: _ (WeakGrade) %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i8:] ;
!     k: s _ [.#.|#|t] ; ! look at this

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tule^WG>i2ss^A
!!€ tul00>issa


"e:i"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
e:i <=> Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* _ (%^WG:) %^E2I: ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ ove^E2I
!!€ ovi0



!! ###  i rules

"i:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i:0 <=>  Vow (:Cns) Cns _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;               ! before metathesis h
                  Cns   _ [e|i] %> [i2:|i3:|i4:] ; ! tie, pii, viedä
          Cns [a|o|ö|ä] _       %> [i2:|i3:|i4:] ; ! hai, koi, naida, puida, vasikoida, käpelöidä
                        _ [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] ;               ! keppi : kepphiin
	           Cns: _ (WeakGrade) %>  [i2:|i3:|i8:] ; ! sopia : sopi, oppia : oppi
		   Cns: _ (%^WG:) %^IDEL: %> i2: ; ! tukki : tukkitten
                   ! tarkista: xxx "i to e in plural" i:e <=> Cns: _ ([Dummy: - %^HMETA:]) %> i2: ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ sii0li^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ siihl00>0iin
!!€ hai>i2t
!!€ ha0>it
!!€ vasikoi>i3n
!!€ vasiko0>in
!!€ vie>i3n
!!€ v0e>in
!!€ oppi>i3
!!€ opp0>i

"i:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i:j <=> Vow _ k:0 :Vow ; ! pojan
        Vow _ k:0 Vow:0 %^WG: %> :i ; ! pojissa

"i2:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i2:j <=> :Vow (Dummy:) %> _ :Vow ;

"i8:0"
i8:0 <=> :Vow Cns:+ [:o|u|y] %> _ [.#.|%>] ; !CHECK! added u for tuntua>tuntu, y for kääntyä>käänty

!!€ sano>i3
!!€ sano>0

!!€ alka>i3
!!€ alko>0

!!€ juo>i3
!!€ j0o>i

!! **Tests:**

!!€ sana>i2^A
!!€ sano>ja

"i:e"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i:e <=> Cns _ %> i2: ;

!!€ tukki>i2^A
!!€ tukke>ja


!! ###  o rules

"o:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
o:0 <=> _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;  ! deletion before metathesis h"

!! **Tests:**

!!€ poro^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ por00>hoon

!! ###  ö rules
"ö:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
ö:0 <=> [Cns|.#.|#] Vow (Cns) Cns: _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; !  deletion before metathesis h

!! **Tests:**

!!€ hölmö^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ hölm00>höön


!! ###  u rules

"u:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
u:0 <=> [Cns|.#.|#] Vow (Cns) Cns _ %^HMETA: ;           ! before metathesis h
        [Cns|.#.|#]               _ [o|u] %> [i2:|i3:|i4:] ; ! tuoda : toi, luu : luissa
                                  _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; !kruunu, kruuhnuun

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tuo>i3n
!!€ t0o>in



!! ###  y rules

"y:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
y:0 <=> [Cns|.#.|#] Vow (Cns) Cns _ %^HMETA: ;         ! deletion before metathesis h"
        [Cns|.#.|#]               _ [y|ö]  (%^WG:) %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i] ; ! x syy, myydä, syödä,
                                  _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ syy>i2ss^A
!!€ s0y>issä





!! ### Vowel copying rules

!! These are the rules connected to the Meänkieli *-h-* suffixes. 
!! The vowel must be copied from the stem to the right of the *h*
!! and also deleted in the stem (cf. *talo : talhoon*)

"a copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:a <=> a: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:     _ [:a] ; ! sauhnaan
          a: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:  :a _    ; ! sauhnaan
          UnroundedVowel (Vow) (:h) Cns:+  a: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h: _ [:a|:i] ; 
          !UnroundedVowel Cns:*  a: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:  :a _    ;
          !UnroundedVowel (Cns:+)  a           %> (h)    _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ; !TEST maahan
          a  %> (h)    _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ; !TEST noutaa 
!! **Tests:**

!!€ hinta^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ hint00>haan

!!€ maa>h^Vn
!!€ maa>han


"o copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:o <=>            o:  [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> h:    _ [:i|:o] ;
                     o:  [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> h: :o _  ;
                      o                      %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
        [.#.|#|Cns]  [a|e|i] (Vow:) (:h) Cns:* a:  [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> h:    _ i2: ; !saunhoin/saunhoin 
        ![.#.|#|Cns]  [a|e|i] Cns:* (:h) (Cns:) a:  [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> h:    _ [:i|i2:] ; !CHECK för vad?
        [#|.#.] (Cns:*) Vow:+ Cns:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns: Cns: (Cns:) a: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> (h:) _ [:i|i2:] ; !Pl+Ill för >2-syll-nouns: a>o efter två Cns (almunakka>almunakhoin)
![.#.|#] Cns:* UnroundedVowel:+ u Cns:+  Vow: (%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:) %> h _ [i2:|i3:|i8:|j|i:] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ talo^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ tal00>hoon

"i copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:i <=> i: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:    _ :i ;
          i: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h: :i _    ;
         :i           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
         [.#.|#] Cns:* RoundedVowel+ Cns:+ (:Cns) a: (%^WG:|%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:)  %> h:_ [i2:] ;  !muna>munhiin Pl+Ill

!! **Tests:**

!!€ silli^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ sill00>hiin


"ä copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:ä <=> ä: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:    _ [:ä|:i] ;
          ä: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h: :ä _    ;
          ä           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
          
"e copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:e <=> e: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:    _ [:e|:i] ;
          e: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h: :e _    ;
          e         %>  (h)     _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;

!!€ puole^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ puol00>heen

"ö copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:ö <=> ö: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:    _ [:ö|:i] ;
          ö: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h: :ö _    ;
          ö           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
          
"y copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:y <=> y: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:    _ [:y|:i] ;
          y: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h: :y _    ;
          y           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
          
"u copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:u <=> u: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h:    _ [:u|:i] ;
          u: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> h: :u _    ;
          u           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;




!! ###  Vowel harmony rule

!! All vowel harmony is taken care of with one rule.
	
"Back harmony"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
 Vx:Vy <=> BackVowel: NonFront:* (:NonFront) NonFront:* %> NonFront:* ([ NonFront: | :NonFront ]) NonFront:* (%>) NonFront:* _ ;  
         where Vx in ( %^A %^O %^U )
               Vy in (   a   o   u )
         matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ nais>i2lt^A
!!€ nais>ilta
!!€ puhu>^A
!!€ puhu>a
!!€ hinkka^WG>t^A
!!€ hink0a0>ta
!!$ katto^WG
!!$ katto0
!!€ keskus>t^A
!!€ keskus>ta	



! san0a>i2ss^A
! sanno>issa ! hmm
! san0a^HMETA>h^Vin
! sann00>hoin

! Test that deliberately fails.

!!€ a
!!€ b
